Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-323.02
Domestic corporation automatically dissolved; denial of reinstatement; appeal.

(1) If the Secretary of State denies a corporation's application for reinstatement following automatic dissolution under section 21-323, he or she shall serve the corporation under section 21-2034 with a written notice that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

(2) The corporation may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the district court of Lancaster County within thirty days after service of the notice of denial is perfected. The corporation shall appeal by petitioning the court to set aside the dissolution and attaching to the petition copies of the Secretary of State's certificate of dissolution, the corporation's application for reinstatement, and the Secretary of State's notice of denial.

(3) The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to reinstate the dissolved corporation or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

(4) The court's final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 199.